Washington statutes.
RCW 3.62.050

Court expenditures to be paid from county current expense fund—Exception.

The total expenditures of the district courts, including the cost of providing courtroom and office space, the cost of probation and parole services and any personnel employment therefor, and the cost of providing services necessary for the preparation and presentation of a defense at public expense, except costs of defense to be paid by a city pursuant to RCW 3.62.070 and the portion of district court judges' salaries distributed by the administrator for the courts pursuant to RCW 2.56.030, shall be paid from the county current expense fund.

[ 2005 c 457 s 6; 1987 c 202 s 114; 1984 c 258 s 308; 1973 1st ex.s. c 10 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 199 s 3; 1969 c 111 s 1; 1963 c 213 s 2; 1961 c 299 s 109.]

NOTES:

Intent—2005 c 457: See note following RCW 43.08.250.

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Intent—1984 c 258: See note following RCW 3.34.130.